South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3614.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 27, Chapter 7, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-7-3445. Every hospital operating in this State must post and provide to the patient's family, and any person with the authority to make healthcare decisions on behalf of the patient, a written plan of care within twenty-four hours of admission to the facility and treatment progress reports at least every twenty-four hours thereafter during the patient's admission. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----